Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BLACK VETERANS SUPPORT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin The commissioner of veterans affairs must award a grant to an organization to develop, operate, and administer a comprehensive support program for Black veterans in Minnesota. The support program must provide Black veterans assistance with mental health services and mental health case management, job training, seeking employment opportunities, accessing health care, achieving homeownership through financial literacy programming, and loans. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to an organization to develop, operate, and administer a Black veterans support program. Of the amount appropriated, $1,500,000 is for mental health services and mental health case management; $1,000,000 is for job-training and employment-seeking programming; $700,000 is for homeownership assistance; $500,000 is for educational support; and $1,000,000 is for administration and outreach. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end